Washington statutes.
RCW 10.91.040

"Judicial officer of this state," "judicial officer" defined.

For the purpose of this chapter "judicial officer of this state" and "judicial officer" mean a judge of the superior or district court.

[ 1987 c 202 s 170; 1971 ex.s. c 17 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.